Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.060

Duplicate receipts.

All persons required by law to pay any moneys into the state treasury, or to transmit any public funds to the state treasurer on state accounts, shall, at the time of making such payments or transmissions specify the amount and date of such payment, and for what particular fund or account.

For all sums of money so paid the state treasurer shall forthwith give duplicate receipts in accordance with the rules and regulations promulgated by the office of financial management as authorized by RCW 43.88.160(1).

[ 1979 c 151 s 89; 1977 c 16 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.060. Prior: 1890 p 643 s 4; RRS s 5504; prior: 1886 p 134 s 4; 1871 p 78 s 4; 1864 p 53 s 5; 1854 p 414 s 5.]